Utah statutes.
32B-6-904.   Specific licensing requirements for beer-only restaurant license.

(1)  To obtain a beer-only restaurant license a person shall comply with Chapter 5, Part 2, Retail Licensing Process.

(2) (a)  A beer-only restaurant license expires the last day of February of each year.

(b)  To renew a person's beer-only restaurant license, a person shall comply with the renewal requirements of Chapter 5, Part 2, Retail Licensing Process, by no later than January 31.

(3) (a)  The nonrefundable application fee for a beer-only restaurant license is $330.

(b)  The initial license fee for a beer-only restaurant license is $825.

(c)  The renewal fee for a beer-only restaurant license is $605.

(4)  The bond amount required for a beer-only restaurant license is the penal sum of $5,000.

